Washington statutes.
RCW 35.63.050

Expenditures.

The expenditures of any commission or regional commission authorized and established under this chapter, exclusive of gifts, shall be within the amounts appropriated for the purpose by the council or board. Within such limits, any commission may employ such employees and expert consultants as are deemed necessary for its work.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.63.050. Prior: 1935 c 44 s 4; RRS s 9322-4.]